Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Agricultural Commodity Commissions Generally
2-8-21.
Issuance of marketing orders authorized; notice; public hearing; record; reports from handlers; compilation of lists of producers and handlers; use of information in reports.

The Commissioner, upon the approval and request of a commission governed by this article, is authorized to issue, administer, and enforce the provisions of marketing orders regulating producer marketing or the handling of agricultural commodities within this state.

Whenever the Commissioner has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order or amendments to an existing marketing order will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this article with respect to any agricultural commodity, he or she shall, either upon his or her own motion, upon the motion of any commission, or upon the application of any producer of such commodity or any organization of such persons, give due notice of and an opportunity for a public hearing either in person or wholly or partially by means of remote communication as determined by the Commissioner upon a proposed marketing order or amendments to an existing marketing order.

Notice of any hearing called for such purpose shall be given by the Commissioner or the commission by publishing a notice of such hearing for a period of not less than five days on the Commissioner’s website and in The Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin or other similar publication that will effectively notify those affected by such marketing order or amendment. The Commissioner or the commission shall also mail a copy of such notice of hearing and a copy of such proposed marketing order or proposed amendments to all producers of such agricultural commodity whose names and addresses appear upon lists of such persons on file in the department and who may be directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order or such proposed amendments.

The hearing and all testimony shall be public. A full and complete record of the proceedings at such hearing shall be made and maintained on file in the office of the Commissioner or the commission. The hearing shall, in all respects, be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The hearing may be conducted by the commission, by a member of the commission, or by the Commissioner, as may be designated by the commission in each instance, but no decision shall be made based on hearings conducted other than by the commission itself, at which a majority of the members thereof are present, until the members of the commission have been afforded an opportunity to review the hearing record. Where the commission conducts hearings, its recommendation shall be based on the findings reached after a review of the record of the hearing.

In order to provide the Commissioner or the commission with accurate and reliable information with respect to the persons who may be directly affected by any proposed marketing order for any agricultural commodity when such information is not then on file in the department, the Commissioner or the commission is authorized and directed, whenever the Commissioner or the commission has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this article or upon receipt of a written application for a hearing pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, to notify all handlers of such agricultural commodity, by publication of a notice as required in paragraph (2) of this subsection, to file with the Commissioner or the commission within ten days from the last date of such publication a report, properly certified, showing:

The correct name and address of such handler;

The quantities of the agricultural commodity affected by the proposed marketing order handled by such handler in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report;

The correct names and addresses of all producers of such agricultural commodity who may be directly affected by such proposed marketing order, from whom such handler received such agricultural commodity in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report; and

The quantities of such agricultural commodity received by such handler from each such producer in the marketing season next preceding the filing of such report.

The notice to handlers requiring them to file a report shall be published by the Commissioner or the commission for a period of not less than five days on the Commissioner’s website and in The Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin or other similar publication that will effectively notify those affected by such marketing order or amendment. The Commissioner or the commission shall also mail a copy of such notice to all handlers of such agricultural commodity whose names and addresses appear upon the lists on file in the department who may be directly affected by such proposed marketing order.

Each handler of an agricultural commodity directly affected by a proposed marketing order shall file his or her verified report with the Commissioner or the commission within the time frame specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection. Failure or refusal of any handler to file such report shall not invalidate any proceeding taken or marketing order issued. The Commissioner or the commission is authorized and directed to proceed upon the basis of such information and reports as may otherwise be available.

From the reports so filed and the information so received or available to the Commissioner or the commission, including any proper corrections, the Commissioner or the commission shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of such producers and the volume of such commodity produced or marketed by all such producers and a list of the names and addresses of such handlers and the volume of such commodity handled by all such handlers, directly affected by such proposed marketing order or amendments thereto, in the preceding marketing season. Such lists shall constitute complete and conclusive lists for use in any finding made by the Commissioner or the commission pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 2-8-23 and such findings shall be conclusive.

The information contained in the individual reports of handlers filed with the Commissioner or the commission pursuant to this Code section shall not be made public in such form. The information contained in such reports may be prepared in combined form for use by the Commissioner or the commission, their agents, or other interested persons in the formulation, administration, and enforcement of a marketing order or may be made available pursuant to court order. Such information shall not be made available to anyone for private purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 11; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-8-13

; Code 1981, §

2-8-21

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 614, § 2/SB 247.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in paragraph (b)(1), inserted “or she” and “or her” near the middle and inserted “either in person or wholly or partially by means of remote communication as determined by the Commissioner” near the end; in paragraph (b)(2), substituted “five days on the Commissioner’s website and in The Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin or other similar publication that will effectively notify those affected by such marketing order or amendment” for “five days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the capital of the state and in such other newspapers as the Commissioner may prescribe” at the end of the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “No such public hearing shall be held prior to five days after the last day of such period of publication.”, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Such notice of hearing shall in all respects comply with the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the ‘Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.’ ” substituted the present first sentence of paragraph (b)(3) for the former first sentence, which read: “The hearing shall be public and all testimony shall be received under oath.”; substituted “five days on the Commissioner’s website and in The Farmers and Consumers Market Bulletin or other similar publication that will effectively notify those affected by such marketing order or amendment” for “five days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the capital of the state and in such other newspaper or newspapers as the Commissioner or the commission may prescribe” at the end of the first sentence of paragraph (c)(2); and, in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(3), inserted “or her” and “frame”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section

28-9-5

, in 1989, the reference to
§

2-8-15

in paragraph (c)(4) was changed to
§

2-8-23

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Agricultural Commodities Promotion,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

2-8-22.
Recommendation of marketing orders or amendments by commission; authorized provisions.

If, upon the basis of the record of testimony and documentary evidence received at the hearing provided for in Code Section 2-8-21 and the facts officially noticed therein from official publications or institutions of recognized standing, the commission determines that the issuance of a marketing order or an amendment will tend to effectuate the intent and purpose of this article, it may recommend the promulgation of a marketing order or amendment with respect to the matters specified in the hearing notice and supported by the record, containing any or all of the following provisions, but no others:

Provisions regulating the period or periods during which any agricultural commodity or any grade, size, or quality of such commodity may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state by any and all persons engaged in such processing, distributing, or marketing within this state; such periods shall be established by the commission so as to conform to the better principles of sound agricultural practices with respect to production of the commodities affected, in order to secure, so far as is commercially practical, a sufficient supply of good quality of each grade of such commodity proportionate to normal market demand and to prevent disruptive marketing practices likely to result in oversupply or scarcity, which create unnecessarily inflated prices to consumers and handlers, depressed prices to producers, or salability of products of inferior grade and quality due to unavailability of good quality products;

Provisions establishing or providing for establishing, with respect to any agricultural commodity, either as delivered by producers to handlers or processors or as handled, processed, or otherwise prepared for market or as marketed by producers, handlers, or processors:

Grading standards of quality, condition, size, maturity, or pack, which standards may include minimum standards, provided that the standards so established shall not be established below any minimum standards prescribed by law for such commodity; and

Uniform inspection and grading of such commodity in accordance with the standards so established.

Provisions for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion to maintain present markets or to create new or larger markets for agricultural commodities grown in this state or for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which obstruct the normal flow of agricultural commodities to market. The commission is authorized to prepare, issue, administer, and enforce plans for promoting the sale of any agricultural commodity, provided that any such plan shall be directed toward promoting and increasing the sale, use, and utilization of such commodity without reference to a particular brand or trade name; and provided, further, that no advertising or sales promotion program shall be issued by the Commissioner or the commission which makes use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of any such product or disparages the quality, value, sale, or use of any other agricultural commodity;

Provisions prohibiting unfair trade practices by which any producer or handler tends toward establishment of monopoly, unfairly discriminates among customers as to price or quality, or engages in fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading representations, concealment, or other similar sharp business practices which are harmful to his or its customers, injurious to competitors, likely to bring into disrepute persons generally engaged in production and handling of the commodity involved, or detrimental to the intent and purpose of this article;

Provisions for carrying on research studies in promoting the production, marketing, sale, use and utilization, processing, and improvement of any agricultural commodity or any combination thereof and for the expenditure of moneys for such purposes. In any research carried on under this paragraph, the dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, the Commissioner, and the commission shall cooperate in selecting the research project or projects to be carried on from time to time. Insofar as practicable such projects shall be carried out by the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences but, if the dean of the college and the commission determine that the college has no facilities for a particular project or that some other research agency has better facilities therefor, the project may be carried out by other research agencies selected by the commission;

Provisions establishing or providing authority for establishing, for any agricultural commodity, either as such commodity is produced or is delivered by producers to handlers or as such commodity is handled or otherwise prepared for market or as such commodity is marketed by producers or handlers, an educational program designed to acquaint producers, handlers, or other interested persons with quality improvement, including sanitation practices, procedures, or methods as applied to such commodity;

Provisions for the promotion of the marketing of surplus commodities through the establishment of surplus, stabilization, or by-product pools for any agricultural commodity or any grade, size, quality, or condition thereof, providing for the sale of the commodity in any such pool and for the equitable distribution among the persons participating therein of the net returns derived from the sale of such commodity. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any such pool or pools, the commission shall have the power to receive such commodity from each producer or handler, to handle the same according to the grade, size, quality, or condition thereof, and to account to each producer or handler participating therein upon a pro rata basis for the net proceeds derived from the sale thereof. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of a surplus, stabilization, or by-product pool, the commission shall have authority to promote the marketing of surplus commodities by making arrangements for and operating any necessary facilities for the storing, financing, grading, hauling, packing, servicing, processing, preparing for market, selling, and disposing of the contents of any pools provided for in this paragraph. Whenever the marketing order authorizes the establishment of any type of pool authorized in this paragraph, the commission shall have authority to create, by a uniform assessment upon producers, or to maintain and disburse, upon some other uniform and equitable basis, an equalization fund to be used for the removal of any inequalities between producers or handlers participating in any pool.

All provisions authorized by this Code section which are contained in marketing orders and amendments thereto heretofore adopted by any commission and in effect on July 1, 1969, shall be and remain of full force and effect until repealed or modified by each such commission as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 13; Ga. L. 1971, p. 78, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 564, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-8-14

; Code 1981, §

2-8-22

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Agricultural Commodities Promotion,” see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

2-8-23.
Approval by producers prerequisite to issuance of marketing order or major amendment; notice; rules and regulations; expiration; extensions; referendum.

No marketing order or major amendment thereto, directly affecting producers or producer marketing, issued pursuant to this article, shall be made effective by the Commissioner or the commission until approved in a referendum by two-thirds of a quorum consisting of at least 25 percent of the notified eligible producers who are engaged within the area specified in such marketing order or amendment thereto.

No marketing order renewal, directly affecting producers or producer marketing, issued pursuant to this article, shall be made effective by the Commissioner or the Commission until approved in a referendum by two-thirds of the producers who are engaged within the area specified in such marketing order or amendment thereto.

Whenever any marketing order or any major amendment to any marketing order is issued by the commission, the commission shall determine whether assent, approval, or favor thereto of the producers shall be by written assents or by referendum.

If the Commissioner or the commission determines that a referendum shall be had, the Commissioner or the commission shall establish a referendum period of 30 days. At the close of such referendum period, the Commissioner or the commission shall count and tabulate the ballots filed during such period.

At a public hearing held to consider a proposed marketing order or major amendments to an existing marketing order which directly affect producers or producer marketing, the Commissioner or the commission shall also receive testimony or evidence from which he or she or it can determine whether the assent, approval, or favor of such producers shall be determined by written assents or by referendum as prescribed in this Code section. Upon the conclusion of any hearing which involves a marketing order or a major amendment thereto directly affecting producers or producer marketing, the Commissioner or the commission shall make a finding, based upon the testimony and evidence received, whether producer assent, approval, or favor shall be determined by written assents or by referendum. If the Commissioner or the commission finds that a referendum shall be had, he or she or it shall direct that a referendum be held in accordance with this subsection.

Any referendum or assent in writing to a marketing order under paragraphs (3), (5), and (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 2-8-22 shall be held pursuant to this Code section; and upon the approval thereof by two-thirds of those voting therein, where the total vote cast thereon represents not less than 25 percent of those eligible to vote or where the total vote cast thereon represents not less than 25 percent of the total amount of the affected agricultural commodity, such marketing order may be declared by the commission to be approved.

In the event of the failure of any proposed marketing order to be approved, no additional referendum thereon shall be held during a period of 12 months from the date of the close of the previous referendum period.

Subject to the provisions, restrictions, and limitations imposed in this article, the Commissioner or the commission may issue marketing orders regulating producer marketing and the processing, distributing, or handling in any manner of agricultural commodities by any and all persons engaged in such producer marketing, processing, distributing, or handling of such agricultural commodities within this state.

Upon the recommendation of not less than three of the appointed members of the commission, the Commissioner or the commission may make effective minor amendments to a marketing order. The Commissioner or the commission may require a public hearing upon minor amendments if in the Commissioner’s or commission’s opinion the substance of such minor amendments so warrants. The Commissioner or the commission, however, shall not be required to submit minor amendments for written assents or referendum approval.

In making effective major amendments to a marketing order, the Commissioner or the commission shall follow the same procedures prescribed in this article for the institution of a marketing order. For the purpose of this article, a major amendment to a marketing order shall include, but shall not be limited to, any amendment which adds to or deletes from any such marketing order any of the following types of regulations or authorizations:

Authority for regulating the period or periods during which any agricultural commodity or any grade, size, or quality of such commodity may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state;

Authority for the establishment of uniform grading and inspection of any agricultural commodity and the establishment of grading standards of quality, condition, size, or pack of such commodity;

Authority for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion of any agricultural commodity;

Authority to prohibit unfair trade practices;

Authority for carrying out research studies in the production, processing, or distribution of any agricultural commodity;

Authority to increase an assessment rate beyond the maximum rate authorized by the marketing order in effect;

Authority to extend the application of the provisions of any marketing order to portions or uses of an agricultural commodity not previously subject to such provisions or to restrict or extend the application of such provisions upon the producers or handlers of such portions or uses of such commodity.

Modification of any provisions of any marketing order in effect, for the purpose of clarifying the meaning or application of such provisions or of modifying administrative procedures for carrying out such provisions, are declared not to be a major amendment of such marketing order.

Upon the issuance of any order making effective a marketing order or any suspension, amendment, or termination thereof, a copy of such notice shall be published as the Commissioner or the commission may prescribe. No marketing order nor any suspension, amendment, or termination thereof shall become effective until the termination of a period of five days from the date of such publication. It shall also be the duty of the Commissioner or the commission to mail a copy of the notice of such issuance to all persons directly affected by the terms of such marketing order, suspension, amendment, or termination whose names and addresses are on file in the office of the Commissioner or the commission and to every person who files in the office of the Commissioner or the commission a written request for such notice.

The Commissioner or the commission shall have the power, consistent with this article and in accordance with marketing orders and agreements made effective under this article, to establish such general rules and regulations for uniform application to all marketing orders issued hereunder as may be necessary to facilitate the administration and enforcement of such marketing orders. The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section relative to publication, mailing of notice, and time of taking effect shall be applicable to any such general rule or regulation established pursuant to this subsection and applicable to marketing orders generally. Such notice shall be furnished by the Commissioner or the commission for each marketing order in active operation.

Upon the recommendation of the commission concerned, the Commissioner shall have the power, consistent with this article, to establish administrative rules and regulations for each marketing order issued and made effective as may be necessary to facilitate the supervision, administration, and enforcement of each such order. The provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section relative to publication, mailing of notice, and time of taking effect shall be applicable to any such administrative rules and regulations.

Unless extended as provided in this Code section, all marketing orders issued under the authority of this article shall expire, terminate, and become of no force and effect at the expiration of three years from the date of the issuance of the original marketing order or, if such marketing order has been extended, at the expiration of three years after the date of any such extension.

In the event either one of the following conditions is complied with, a marketing order shall be extended for a period of three years after the date of its original expiration:

Assent has been given in writing to such marketing order by not less than two-thirds of the producers participating; or

Approval or favor of such marketing order has been given by producers in a referendum among producers directly affected if at least 66 2/3 percent of the votes cast in such referendum favor the extension of such marketing order.

If the Commissioner or the commission determines that a referendum shall be held, the Commissioner or the commission shall establish a referendum period of 30 days, such referendum period to terminate at least 30 days prior to the expiration date of the marketing order which is the subject of such referendum. At the close of such referendum period, the Commissioner or the commission shall count and tabulate the ballots cast during such period. If from such tabulation the Commissioner or the commission finds that the number of producers voting in favor of the extension of such marketing order is not less than 66 2/3 percent of the total number of ballots cast, then such marketing order shall be extended for a period of three years after the expiration date. If it is found from the tabulation of such referendum that the number of producers who had voted in favor of the extension of such marketing order is less than the required 66 2/3 percent of the total number of ballots cast, then the marketing order shall expire, terminate, and be of no force and effect as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 14; Ga. L. 1964, p. 141, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, §§ 15, 16; Code 1981, §

2-8-15

; Code 1981, §

2-8-23

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 614, § 3/SB 247; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 2/HB 1428.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote paragraph (a)(1), which read: “No marketing order or major amendment thereto, directly affecting producers or producer marketing, issued pursuant to this article, shall be made effective by the commission or the Commissioner until the finding of one or more of the following:

“(A) That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been assented to in writing by not less than 65 percent of the producers who are engaged within the area specified in such marketing order or amendment thereto in the production for market or the producer marketing of not less than 51 percent of the agricultural commodity specified therein in commercial quantities;

“(B) That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been assented to in writing by producers who produce not less than 65 percent of the volume of such agricultural commodity and by 51 percent of the total number of producers so engaged; or

“(C) That such marketing order or amendment thereto has been approved or favored by producers in a referendum among producers directly affected if the valid votes cast in such referendum in favor of such marketing order or amendment thereto represent not less than 51 percent of the total number of producers of the commodity of record with the department who marketed not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity marketed in the next preceding marketing season by the total number of producers of record with the department.”; deleted the former last two sentences of paragraph (a)(3), which read: “If from such tabulation the Commissioner or the commission finds that the number of producers voting in favor of such marketing order or amendment thereto is not less than 51 percent of the total number of producers of record with the department and that such producers who voted in favor of the marketing order or amendment thereto marketed not less than 51 percent of the total volume of such commodity marketed by all producers of record with the department during the marketing season next preceding such referendum, the Commissioner or the commission may make such marketing order or amendment thereto effective. The Commissioner and the commission are authorized to prescribe such additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct such referendum.”; inserted “or she” near the middle of the first and last sentences of paragraph (a)(4); substituted “the Commissioner’s or commission’s” for “his or its” in the second sentence of paragraph (c)(1); deleted “a notice thereof shall be posted on a public bulletin board maintained at the Department of Agriculture; and” following “or termination thereof,” in the first sentence of subsection (d); substituted “publication, mailing of notice,” for “posting, publication,” near the beginning of the second sentence of subsection (e); and deleted “posting” following “this Code section relative to” in the second sentence of subsection (f).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “appointed” for “appointive” in the first sentence of paragraph (c)(1); and deleted “posting and” preceding “publication” in the second sentence in subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, a comma following “to” was deleted in the second sentence of subsection (f).

2-8-23.1.
Limitations on assessments.

No marketing order issued by the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Beef shall impose an assessment in excess of $1.00 per head on bovine animals sold, nor shall any assessment be placed on any bovine animal which sells for less than $100.00.

The Agricultural Commodity Commission for Beef may in its discretion lower the assessment amount imposed by any marketing regulation duly issued under the authority provided by this article.

No marketing order issued by the Agricultural Commodity Commission for Wine and Grapes shall exceed the highest excise tax levied under Code Section 3-6-50.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-23.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 65, § 4/SB 97; Ga. L. 2020, p. 611, § 4/HB 1093.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, added subsection (c).

2-8-24.
Area marketing orders authorized.

Marketing orders issued by any commission under this article may be limited in their application by prescribing the marketing areas or portions of the state in which a particular order shall be effective, provided that no marketing order shall be issued by the commission unless it embraces all persons of a like class who are engaged in a specific and distinctive agricultural industry or trade within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 17; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 11; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 18; Code 1981, §

2-8-16

; Code 1981, §

2-8-24

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-25.
Seasonal marketing regulations authorized; notice of issuance; liberal interpretation of Code section.

The Commissioner, upon recommendation of the commission concerned, and each commission, without prior notice to and public hearing for the producers or handlers of the commodity directly affected, may issue and make effective seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof, provided that the marketing order, made effective after due notice, public hearing, and written assent as required by this article, (1) provides for the issuance or modification of such seasonal marketing regulations without requiring such prior notice and public hearing, and (2) sets forth the limits within which such seasonal marketing regulations may be made effective or subsequently modified by the Commissioner or the commission; and provided, further, that the commission finds that such seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof are reasonable and proper and a practical means of carrying out the marketing provisions authorized in such marketing order or agreement and will effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this article with respect to such agricultural commodity. Notice of the issuance and the effective date of any such seasonal marketing regulations or modifications thereof shall be given by the Commissioner or the commission to all producers and handlers directly affected by any such regulations in the manner and within the time specified in the applicable marketing order or, in absence of such, as may be specified by the commission or as specified in the administrative rules and regulations made effective for such marketing order pursuant to subsection (f) of Code Section 2-8-23.

It is recognized that with respect to some agricultural commodities, marketing, weather, and other conditions may change so rapidly as to require changes in seasonal marketing regulations from week to week or more often. It is intended that this Code section be interpreted liberally so that the Commissioner or the commission may be enabled to carry out the marketing regulations and procedures authorized in this Code section in a practical and effective manner.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 14; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 7; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 14; Code 1981, §

2-8-17

; Code 1981, §

2-8-25

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-26.
Applicability of marketing orders.

Whenever producers or handlers of an agricultural commodity regulated by a marketing order issued by any commission pursuant to this article are required to comply with minimum quality, condition, size, or maturity regulations, no person, except as otherwise provided in such order, shall process, distribute, or otherwise handle any of such agricultural commodity from any source, whether produced within or without this state, which commodity does not meet such minimum requirements applicable to producers or handlers of such commodity in this state, provided that such regulations shall not apply to any commodity which has been produced outside of this state and is in transit on the effective date of the regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 301, § 17; Ga. L. 1968, p. 398, § 11; Ga. L. 1969, p. 763, § 18; Code 1981, §

2-8-18

; Code 1981, §

2-8-26

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.